apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON GUOVTTU !Here because other lexicons don't fit for it
 +N+Coll+Sg+Nom:ovtto%>s K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Dial/%-GG:kto%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:kto%> PxV2 ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Dial/%-KJ:ovtto%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:ovtto%> PxV2 ;
 +N+Coll+SgGenCmp:kto%> R ;
 +N+Coll+SgGenCmp:ovtto%> R ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Dial/%-GG:kto%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:kto%> PxV2 ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Dial/%-KJ:ovtto%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:ovtto%> PxV2 ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:ktu%>j K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:kto%>s%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Dial/%-GG:kto%>s K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:kto%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:kto%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Dial/%-KJ:ovtto%>s K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:ovtto%>s K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:ovtto%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>jn K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:ktu%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>jn K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:ovttu%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:kto%>t K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:ovtto%>t K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:ovttu%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:ktu%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Coll+PlGenCmp+Use/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Coll+PlGenCmp:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ktu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Coll+PlGenCmp+Use/Sub:ktu%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Coll+PlGenCmp:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ktu%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ovttu%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:ovttu%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ktu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ktu%>X5jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:ktu%>%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>jde K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:ktu%>jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>jde K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:ovttu%>jdasa%> PxV ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>jn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ovttu%>js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:ovttu%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>jn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ktu%>js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:ktu%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com+Dial/%-GG:ktu%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com/Sh:ktu%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:ktu%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com+Dial/%-KJ:ovttu%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com/Sh:ovttu%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:ovttu%>jd%> PxPlComC ;


LEXICON GARGIA
! light fin syll, bisyll. on -o- that doesn't have change o:u in front of j (i): Kino
! gen = nom ill = -i
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>i K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;
 +N+Ess:%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>id9 K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>id9 R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>id9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ide K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>igujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>i%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:%>in%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess+Use/Ped:%>n%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:%>id%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:%>id%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:%>id%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:%>idas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:%>in%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:%>id%> PxPlComC ;
! +N:%> DenominalNounsV ; !This is not very plausible
 +N:%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:%> DenominalAdjsV2 ;				!This is not very plausible



LEXICON BUFFALO
 !heavy fin syll
 !gen = -a ill = -ii
 !parallel to NYSTØ
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:a%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:a%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:a%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:a%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess+Use/Ped:a%>n%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>jdas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N:a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible
 
LEXICON ESSAYA !recent loanwords on vow+a
 +N+Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:a%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:a%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess+Use/Ped:a%>n%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>jdas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N:a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible


LEXICON MASAI
 !heavy fin syll
 !gen = -a ill = -ii
 !parallel to NYSTØ
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%> R ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/Ped:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+Use/Ped:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>sa%> PxA ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+Use/Ped:a%>st%> PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Com+Use/Ped:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Ess+Use/Ped:a%>n%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> Px1C ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Acc+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Ill+Use/Ped:a%>jdas%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Use/Ped:a%>jn%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Use/Ped:a%>jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +N:a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible


LEXICON KULTUR !Recent loanwords on -vra with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:r%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Use/Sub:v'ra%> R ;	!
 +N+Sg+Nom:v'ra%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:v'ra%> Px3V ;
 +N:v'ra%> EssV ;
 +N:v'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:v'ra%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:v'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:v'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:v'ra DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON KANTUR
 +N+SgNomCmp:ántor%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ántur%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp+Use/Sub:antuv'ra%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:antuv'ra%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:antuv'ra%> Px3V ;
 +N:antuv'ra%> EssV ;
 +N:antuv'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:antuv'ra%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON MASKIN !Recent loanwords on -iidna with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:in%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ijdna%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:ijdna%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:ijdna%> Px3V ;
 +N:ijdna%> EssV ;
 +N:ijdna%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:ijdna%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:ijdna DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:ijdna DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:ijdna DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON Noun
algebra GARGIA ;
alléa:allé ESSAYA ;
aniliidna:anil MASKIN ; !^LOAN
appelsiidna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Plant:appels MASKIN ;
arkitektuvra:arkitektu KULTUR ;
auditoria GARGIA ;
bassaladdan#mašiidna:bassaladdan#maš MASKIN ;
biebmo#ráhkadan#mašiidna:biebmo#ráhkadan#maš MASKIN ;
bilága GARGIA ;
bivdo#kultuvra:bivdo#kultu KULTUR ;
brutto GARGIA ;
bušeahtta#struktuvra:bušeahtta#struktu KULTUR ;
báŋko#giro GARGIA ;
cyaniidna:cy^an MASKIN ; !^LOAN
dikta#figuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:dikta#figu KULTUR ;
dipma#margariidna:dipma#margar MASKIN ;
doaktár#kántuvra+Use/Sub:doaktár#kántu KULTUR ;
doavttir#kantuvra:doavttir#k KANTUR ;
dosentuvra:dosentu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
dynámo GARGIA ; !^LOAN
ealáhus#struktuvra:ealáhus#struktu KULTUR ;
evangelium:evangeli^um9 BUFFALO ;
fauna:fauna GARGIA ;
figuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:figu KULTUR ;
filéa:filé ESSAYA ;
formaliidna:formal MASKIN ; !^LOAN
gardiidna:gard MASKIN ; !^LOAN
geavaheddjiid#kantuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Org:geavaheddjiid9#k KANTUR ;
geavaheddjiid#kantuvra:geavaheddjiid9#k KANTUR ;  
glykogen+Use/Sub:glykogen BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
goaivun#mašiidna:goaivun#maš MASKIN ;
gratiidna:grat MASKIN ; !^LOAN
guovllo#kantuvra+Use/Sub:guovllo#k KANTUR ;
guovllu#kántuvra+Use/Sub:guovllu#kántu KULTUR ;
hallusinogen+Use/Sub:hallusinogen BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
halogen+Use/Sub:halogen BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
histamiidna:histam MASKIN ; !^LOAN
huksen#kultuvra:huksen#kultu KULTUR ;
hydrogen+Use/Sub:hydrogen BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
hyperbel+Use/Sub:hyperbel BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
idea:ide ESSAYA ;
ironia+Use/Sub:ironia GARGIA ;
ivdne#temperatuvra:ivdne#temperatu KULTUR ;
jursan#mašiidna:jursan#maš MASKIN ;
kafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:kafe ESSAYA ;
kaféa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:kafé ESSAYA ;
kaloria+Use/Sub:kaloria GARGIA ;
kandidatuvra:kandidatu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
kantuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Org:k KANTUR ;
kaseiidna:kase^ MASKIN ; !^LOAN
kassia GARGIA ;
kino+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:kino GARGIA ;
kitiidna:kit MASKIN ; !^LOAN
klamydia GARGIA ;
klaviatuvra:klavi^atu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
komedia GARGIA ;
konto GARGIA ; !Ill. kontoi
korrektuvra:korrektu KULTUR ;
krystalliidna:krystall MASKIN ; !^LOAN
kultuvra:kultu KULTUR ;
kántuvra+Use/Sub:kántu KULTUR ;
kárri:kárri GARGIA ;
lemma GARGIA ;
ligniidna:lign MASKIN ; !^LOAN
litteratuvra:litteratu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
luodda#iskan#mašiidna:luodda#iskan#maš MASKIN ;
luodda#struktuvra:luodda#struktu KULTUR ;
masai+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:masai MASAI ;
mašiidna:maš MASKIN ;
meieria+Use/Sub:meieria GARGIA ;
molybden+Use/Sub:molybden BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
morfiidna:morf MASKIN ; !^LOAN
musea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:muse ESSAYA ;
muslim+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:muslim9 BUFFALO ;
mutuvra:mutu KULTUR ;
máilmmi#cup:máilmmi#cup9 BUFFALO ;
máŋgga#adni#mašiidna:máŋgga#adni#maš MASKIN ;
nomenklatuvra:nomen^klatu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
nukleo#proteiidna:nukleo#prote^ MASKIN ; !^LOAN
oasti#saldo GARGIA ;
oksygen+Use/Sub:oksygen BUFFALO ;
oppalaš#jursan#mašiidna:oppalaš#jursan#maš MASKIN ;
ovda#kantuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Org+Plc:ovda#k KANTUR ;
paprika:paprika GARGIA ;
partituvra:partitu KULTUR ; !^LOAN
pektiidna:pekt MASKIN ; !^LOAN
personála#kantuvra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Org+Plc:personála#k KANTUR ;
personála#kantuvra+Use/Sub:personála#kantu KULTUR ;
piáno:pi^áno GARGIA ;
plasma GARGIA ; !^LOAN
plastiliidna:plastil MASKIN ; !^LOAN
playboy+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:playboy BUFFALO ;
protoplasma:proto^plasma GARGIA ; !^LOAN
riekte#veahkke#kántuvra+Use/Sub:riekte#veahkke#kántu KULTUR ;
risiko+Use/Sub:risiko BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
rádio GARGIA ;
ráhkadus#mašiidna:ráhkadus#maš MASKIN ;
sektovra:sekto KULTUR ;
sosiál#kántuvra+Use/Sub:sosi^ál#kántu KULTUR ;
struma GARGIA ;
symposia GARGIA ;
sáme#cup:sáme#cup9 BUFFALO ;
sámi#kultuvra+Use/Sub:sámi#kultu KULTUR ;
tara:tara GARGIA ;
tivoli GARGIA ; !^LOAN
toksiidna:toks MASKIN ; !^LOAN
traktuvra+Use/Sub:traktu KULTUR ;
trinitrotoluen:trinitrotolu^en BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
trofea:trofe ESSAYA ;
trokea:troke ESSAYA ;
vadjan#mašiidna:vadjan#maš MASKIN ;
veto GARGIA ;
áhččemin BUFFALO ;
østrogen+Use/Sub:østrogen BUFFALO ; !^LOAN !
šiehtadallan#veto GARGIA ;
šliipen#mašiidna:šliipen#maš MASKIN ;
šolgan#temperatuvra:šolgan#temperatu KULTUR ;
